Massachusetts, session 194th, S1994.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting the following paragraph:-
"Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a not for profit corporation,
as defined in chapter 180 of the General Laws, situated within the Commonwealth with total
assets exceeding $10,000,000 as reported in financial statements included in the statutorily
required annual report to the secretary of state's office, shall be subject to taxation of real
property; provided, however, that a not for profit health and human service provider, church,
synagogue or other building, structure, or place of worship shall not be subject to real property
taxation."
of 1